Nebraska statutes.
Sec. 22.Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 201477-1022
Related persons, defined.

Related persons
means any corporations, partnerships, limited liability companies, or joint
ventures which are or would otherwise be members of the same unitary group,
if incorporated, or any persons who are considered to be related persons under
either section 267(b) and (c) or section 707(b) of the Internal Revenue Code
of 1986, as amended.

Laws 2010, LB1018, § 22.